Hawaii statutes.
[§346-69] Welfare safety net program;
department of human services. The department of human services may create
a welfare safety net program entitled "Keeping Hope Alive" to assist
working families that will be disqualified from receiving further public
assistance as a consequence of reaching the five-year time limit set by the
federal Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity [Reconciliation] Act of
1996. [L 2001, c 150, §4]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next